Utah statutes.
76-8-717.   Violations -- Classifications of offenses.

Any student or employee found guilty of a violation of those sections which specify this section as prescribing the punishment shall be punished as follows:

(1)  Upon the first and second conviction, shall be punished as a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  If the defendant has been convicted two or more times of a violation of any offense specified punishable under this section, he shall be punished for a class A misdemeanor.

